Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.490

Violation of chapter—Penalty—Appeal.

Any person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of the provisions of this chapter may be assessed a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars or more than ten thousand dollars per violation. The department, after consulting with the board and receiving the board's recommendations, shall set by rule a schedule of penalties for violating this chapter. The department shall notify the person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity violating any of these provisions of the amount of the penalty and of the specific violation. The notice shall be sent using a method by which the mailing can be tracked or the delivery can be confirmed to the last known address of the assessed party. Penalties are subject to review by an appeal to the board. The filing of an appeal stays the effect of the penalty until the board makes its decision. The appeal shall be filed within twenty days after notice of the penalty is given to the assessed party, and shall be made by filing a written notice of appeal with the department. The notice shall be accompanied by a certified check for two hundred dollars or ten percent of the penalty amount, whichever is less, but in no event less than one hundred dollars. The check shall be returned to the assessed party if the decision of the department is not sustained by the board. If the board sustains the decision of the department, the amount of the check shall be applied by the department to the payment of the per diem and expenses of the members of the board incurred in the matter, and any balance remaining after payment of per diem and expenses shall be paid into the electrical license fund. The hearing and review procedures shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW. The board shall assign its hearings to an administrative law judge to conduct the hearing and issue a proposed decision and order. The board shall be allowed a minimum of twenty days to review a proposed decision and shall issue its decision no later than the next regularly scheduled board meeting.

[ 2014 c 190 s 4; 2011 c 301 s 9; 2000 c 238 s 213.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 190: See note following RCW 19.28.131.

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.